Missouri, session 2026, HB3377.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 70.631, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 70.631, to read as follows:
70.631. 1. Each political subdivision may, by majority vote of its governing body,
elect to cover telecommunicator first responders, jailors, road crew workers, lineworkers,
and emergency medical service personnel as public safety personnel members of the system.
The clerk or secretary of the political subdivision shall certify an election concerning the
coverage of telecommunicator first responders, jailors, road crew workers, lineworkers,and
emergency medical service personnel as public safety personnel members of the system to the
board within ten days after such vote. The date in which the political subdivision's election
becomes effective shall be the first day of the calendar month specified by such governing
body, the first day of the calendar month next following receipt by the board of the
certification of the election, or the effective date of the political subdivision's becoming an
employer, whichever is the latest date. Such election shall not be changed after the effective
date. If the election is made, the coverage provisions shall be applicable to all past and future
employment with the employer by present and future employees. If a political subdivision
makes no election under this section, no telecommunicator first responder, jailor, road crew
worker, lineworker, or emergency medical service personnel of the political subdivision
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3377 2
shall be considered public safety personnel for purposes of determining a minimum service
retirement age as defined in section 70.600.
2. If an employer elects to cover telecommunicator first responders, jailors, road
crew workers, lineworkers, and emergency medical service personnel as public safety
personnel members of the system, the employer's contributions shall be correspondingly
changed effective the same date as the effective date of the political subdivision's election.
3. The limitation on increases in an employer's contributions provided by subsection
6 of section 70.730 shall not apply to any contribution increase resulting from an employer
making an election under the provisions of this section.
✔